Hawaii statutes.
[§76-30.5] Leaves of absence to accept
appointed positions exempt from the civil service; prohibited.
Notwithstanding section 78-23, no leave of absence shall be granted to any
employee who leaves a position covered under this chapter for a position that
is exempt from this chapter under section 76-16(b)(7), (8), (9), (10), or (16)
and whose term of appointment is not less than one year; provided that this
section shall not apply to any employee whose collective bargaining agreement
provides for the granting of a longer leave of absence. [L 2010, c 70, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next